Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB989.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(a) and (b) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, are amended to read:Section 7. Contracts; Effect of Rescission.--(a) Where goods or services having a sale price of twenty-five dollars ($25) or more are sold or contracted to be sold to a buyer, as a result of, or in connection with, a contact with or call on the buyer or resident at his residence either in person or by telephone, or initiated by a buyer via an Internet website or software application, that consumer may avoid the contract or 12345678910111213141516171819 sale by notifying, in writing, the seller within three full business days following the day on which the contract or sale was made and by returning or holding available for return to the seller, in its original condition, any merchandise received under the contract or sale. Such notice of rescission shall be effective upon depositing the same in the United States mail or upon other service which gives the seller notice of rescission.(b) At the time of the sale or contract the buyer shall be provided with:(1) A fully completed receipt or copy of any contract pertaining to such sale, which is in the same language (Spanish, English, etc.) as that principally used in the oral or online sales presentation, and also in English, and which shows the date of the transaction and contains the name and address, both physical and email, of the seller, and in immediate proximity to the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer or on the front page of the receipt if a contract is not used and in bold face type of a minimum size of ten points, a statement in substantially the following form:"You, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to midnight of the third business day after the date of this transaction. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right."(2) A completed form in duplicate, captioned "Notice of Cancellation," which shall be attached to the contract or receipt and easily detachable, and which shall contain in ten-point bold face type the following information and statements in the same language (Spanish, English, etc.) as that used in the contract:Notice of Cancellation20250HB0989PN1080 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Enter Date of Transaction)You may cancel this transaction, without any penalty or obligation, within three business days from the above date.If you cancel, any property traded in, any payments made by you under the contract or sale, and any negotiable instrument executed by you will be returned within ten business days following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be cancelled.If you cancel, you must make available to the seller at your residence in substantially as good condition as when received, any goods delivered to you under this contract or sale; or you may, if you wish, comply with the instructions of the seller regarding the return shipment of the goods at the seller's expense and risk.If you do make the goods available to the seller and the seller does not pick them up within twenty days of the date of your notice of cancellation, you may retain or dispose of the goods without any further obligation.If you fail to make the goods available to the seller, or if you agree to return the goods to the seller and fail to do so, then you remain liable for performance of all obligations under the contract.To cancel this transaction, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written notice, or send a telegram or email, to (name of seller), at (address of seller's place of business, both physical and email) not later than midnight of (date).I hereby cancel this transaction...........................20250HB0989PN1080 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Date)..............................................................(Buyer's Signature)* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0989PN1080 - 4 - 12345